Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-173
Zoning resolutions; adoption; publication; printing; effect.

The county board may also pass, approve and publish any other resolution governing and controlling zoning after the zoning district is created and established as provided in section 23-114.03, and when such resolutions are passed and approved, they shall be published as provided in section 23-172. If any resolution is published by printing the same in book or pamphlet form, purporting to be published by authority of the county board, the same need not be otherwise published, and such book or pamphlet shall be received as evidence of the passage and legal publication of such resolution, as of the dates mentioned in such book or pamphlet, in all courts without further proof.

Laws 1941, c. 131, § 19, p. 515;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-159;

R.S.1943, § 23-173;

Laws 1967, c. 117, § 13, p. 376;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 29.